Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201882-603
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Nebraska Agritourism Promotion Act:

(1) Agritourism activities include any one or any combination of the following: Hunting, fishing, swimming, boating, canoeing, kayaking, tubing, water sports, camping, picnicking, hiking, backpacking, bicycling, horseback riding, nature study, birding, farm, ranch, and vineyard tours and activities, harvest-your-own activities, waterskiing, snow-shoeing, cross-country skiing, visiting and viewing historical, ecological, archaeological, scenic, or scientific sites, and similar activities;

(2) Fee means the amount of money asked in return for an invitation or permission to enter the premises;

(3) Inherent risks means those conditions, dangers, or hazards that are an integral part of land or waters used for agritourism activities, including the following:

(a) Surface and subsurface conditions and natural conditions of land, vegetation, and waters;

(b) The behavior of wild or domestic animals;

(c) The ordinary dangers of structures or equipment ordinarily used in farming or ranching operations when such structures or equipment are used for farming or ranching purposes; and

(d) The potential of a participant to act in a negligent way that may contribute to injury to the participant or others whether by failing to follow safety procedures or failing to act with reasonable caution while engaging in an agritourism activity;

(4) Owner includes any person who is a tenant, lessee, occupant, or person in control of the premises or any agent of such a person whose gross annual income from agritourism activities does not exceed five hundred thousand dollars;

(5) Participant means an individual who engages in agritourism activities on premises owned by another but does not include an owner of the premises or any agent, employee, or contractor of the owner;

(6) Person means an individual, corporation, limited liability company, partnership, unincorporated association, or other legal or commercial entity and does not include a governmental entity or political subdivision; and

(7) Premises includes land, roads, pathways, trails, water, watercourses, private ways, and buildings and structures attached to the land outside of cities and villages and does not include land zoned commercial, industrial, or residential.

Laws 2015, LB329, § 3.